Connecticut, session 2026, HB05501.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 13a-175a of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) For each fiscal year there shall be allocated twelve million five
hundred thousand dollars out of the funds appropriated to the
Department of Transportation, or from any other source, not otherwise
prohibited by law, to be used by the towns for (1) [for] the construction,
reconstruction, improvement and maintenance of highways, sections of
highways, bridges and structures incidental to highways and bridges,
including (A) construction, reconstruction, improvements and
maintenance intended to increase resiliency against increased
precipitation, flooding, sea level rise and extreme heat, and (B) the
plowing of snow, the sanding of icy pavements, the trimming and
removal of trees, the installation, replacement and maintenance of traffic
signs, signals and markings, (2) [for] the purchase and maintenance of
HB5501 / File No. 273 1

HB5501 File No. 273
equipment used for the purposes described in subdivision (1) of this
subsection, including, but not limited to, street sweepers, roadside
mowing and vegetation management equipment, snow removal and
de-icing equipment and equipment to clean catch basins, (3) traffic
control and vehicular safety programs, traffic and parking planning and
administration, and other purposes and programs related to highways,
traffic and parking, and [(3) for] (4) the purposes of providing and
operating essential public transportation services and related facilities.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, in the secretary's
discretion, may approve the use of funds by a town for purposes other
than those enumerated in said subsection.
(c) Not later than September 1, 2022, and annually thereafter, each
town or district that received funds pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section in the preceding fiscal year shall submit a report to the
Commissioner of Transportation, in the form and manner prescribed by
the commissioner, detailing the amount of such funds expended in such
fiscal year for each of the usages enumerated in said subsection or
approved pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
(d) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall reduce
the grant payable to a town or district in accordance with subsection (a)
of this section by ten per cent in any fiscal year that the town or district
fails to timely submit the report required by subsection (c) of this
section. The secretary shall waive such reduction if the town or district
submits such report after the due date and provides proof of such
submission to the secretary.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 13a-175a
PD Joint Favorable
HB5501 / File No. 273 2

HB5501 File No. 273
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which expands the allowable municipal uses of Town Aid
Road (TAR) funds, does not result in a fiscal impact. Since TAR funds
are fully expended annually, the bill may result in a change to the
purposes of grants but not the amount spent.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5501 / File No. 273 3

HB5501 File No. 273
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5501
AN ACT EXPANDING PERMISSIBLE USES FOR TOWN AID ROAD
GRANT FUNDS.